Utah statutes.
4-31-15.   Report of vesicular disease.
Any person who identifies symptoms of vesicular disease in livestock shall
immediately report it to the department. Failure of a veterinarian licensed in
this state to report a diagnosed case of vesicular disease to the department
constitutes ground for the revocation of such veterinarian's license. Failure
by the owner of livestock to report symptoms of vesicular disease among such
owner's livestock constitutes forfeiture of the right to claim an indemnity
for an animal slaughtered on account of the disease.
